Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1238
Violations; seizure and disposition of explosives.

Any explosive materials or destructive devices involved in any violation of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such sections or in any violation of any other criminal law of this state shall be subject to seizure, and disposition may be made in accordance with the method of disposition directed for contraband in section 29-820, whenever the seized matter results in a judicial civil or criminal action by or against any person or as the Nebraska State Patrol directs in the absence of such judicial action.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 270;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 16.